California, session 20252026, AB2447.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 29 (commencing with Section 16300) is added to Division 7 of the Water Code, to read: CHAPTER 29. Water Supply Protection Nitrogen Pollution Reduction Act16300. This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the Water Supply Protection Nitrogen Pollution Reduction Act.16302. (a) The state board shall require the regional boards to update the Irrigated Lands Regulatory Program in order to reduce nitrogen waste discharges from commercial irrigated agricultural lands so that by January 1, 2030, those lands do not cause or contribute to both either of the following:(1) Exceedances of the maximum contaminant level for nitrate, as set forth in Section 64431 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations. Regulations, for waters designated for municipal and domestic supply.(2) Exceedances of a water quality objective or total maximum daily load for nitrate, as set forth in applicable approved basin plans.(b) Consistent with Section 13263, the regional boards shall adopt revised orders with waste discharge requirements on or before January 1, 2028, that are sufficient to meet the reductions in nitrogen waste discharge described in subdivision (a) and shall include both of the following:(1) Quantitative limits on nitrogen fertilizer application and nitrogen discharge implemented through an adaptive irrigation and nutrient management plan designed to minimize nitrogen discharge.(2) Sufficient procedures to ensure compliance with the limits described in paragraph (1), which may include, but is not limited to, verification by a certified crop advisor or cooperative or independent monitoring program, cross-referencing fertilizer application information with fertilizer sales information, and water quality or soil testing.(c) The orders described in subdivision (b) may include, if they are designed to meet the reductions in nitrogen waste discharge described in subdivision (a), any of the following: include any of the following elements, provided the elements are designed to meet the reductions in nitrogen waste discharge described in subdivision (a):(1) Provisions to encourage increased participation in programs designed to reduce nitrogen waste and greenhouse gas emissions from agriculture and improve soil health, including, but not limited to, the Healthy Soils Program, the Organic Transition Pilot Program, and the State Water Efficiency and Enhancement Program.(2) Standardized figures estimating reductions in nitrogen discharge for certain sustainable farming practices based on the best available science, including practices supported by programs described in paragraph (1).(3) Credits or discount factors based on the standardized figures in paragraph (1), which may be accounted for in meeting the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).(4) Interim limits on nitrogen pollution that accommodate regional differences in agricultural production or surface or groundwater quality.(5) Alternative or streamlined compliance pathways for small and diversified farms of fewer than 50 acres, including simplified monitoring and reporting procedures as well as forms published in languages spoken by small farmer operators, including, but not limited to, Spanish, Hmong, Mandarin, and Punjabi.(d) Consistent with existing law and regulations, the state board may adjust its fee schedule for the Irrigated Lands Regulatory Program to cover the cost of the state board and regional boards in implementing this update to the program. Any adjustment to the fee schedule by the state board shall not include discounts on a per-acre basis for larger farms, which have the effect of smaller farms paying higher per-acre fees than larger farms.(e) (1) On or before July 1, 2027, the state board shall publish both a list of standardized crop names and categories, and a statewide methodology for calculating, and field-level reporting of, nitrogen balances for croplands, including nitrogen fertilizer applications and nitrogen discharges, that shall account for available soil nitrogen, to be used by the regional boards and incorporated into the orders described in subdivision (b).(2) The field-level data produced by the field-level reporting described in paragraph (1) shall be made publicly available.(f) On or before January 1, 2031, the state board, in coordination with the regional boards, shall submit a report to the relevant policy committees of the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, on progress achieved in implementing this chapter, including data on the extent of progress made toward meeting the reductions in nitrogen waste discharges through the update to the Irrigated Lands Regulatory Program as described in subdivision (a).(g) Nothing in this section is intended to weaken existing water quality protections in this division. In the event of a conflict between the provisions of this section and any other law, the more stringent provision shall prevail.(h) For purposes of this section, commercial irrigated agricultural lands shall include, but are not limited to, lands that are irrigated to produce crops or pasture for commercial purposes with one or more of the following characteristics:(1) The landowner or operator holds a current operator identification number or permit number for pesticide use reporting.(2) The crop is sold to a third party, including, but not limited to, any of the following:(A) An industry cooperative.(B) A harvest crew or company.(C) A direct marketing location, including a farmers’ market.(3) The landowner or operator files federal taxes using the Internal Revenue Service Schedule F (Form 1040) for Profit or Loss From Farming.16304.(a)It is the policy of the state to encourage fertilizer companies to increase research, investment, and sale of more efficient fertilizer technologies to protect water supplies, reduce nitrate leaching, and reduce nitrous oxide emissions.(b)Upon appropriation of funds by the Legislature, and in furtherance of the policy described in subdivision (a), the state board shall convene a Safer Fertilizer Task Force in coordination with the Department of Food and Agriculture to establish best available technology standards for nitrogen-based fertilizers.(c)The Safer Fertilizer Task Force shall include persons representing organizations focused on climate-resilient or sustainable agriculture, water quality protection, public health, and biodiversity, as well as persons representing academic institutions, agricultural producers, the fertilizer industry, and appropriate state or local agencies.(d)In developing best available technology standards, the Safer Fertilizer Task Force shall consider the following:(1)Scientific and peer-reviewed research on fertilizer efficiency and technologies, including enhanced efficiency fertilizers.(2)Life-cycle and field performance data.(3)Technological feasibility and cost-effectiveness.(4)Impact on small and disadvantaged farmers.(e)The best available technology standards referenced in subdivision (b) shall be designed to prioritize the following:(1)Reductions in nitrate leaching and runoff to the greatest extent feasible.(2)Reductions in nitrous oxide emissions to the greatest extent feasible, as required by the state’s policy to achieve net zero greenhouse gas emissions as soon as possible, but not later than 2045, and achieve and maintain net negative greenhouse gas emissions after 2045.(3)Enhanced synchronization of nitrogen release with crop uptake.(f)The Safer Fertilizer Task Force shall consult with the Fertilizer Inspection Advisory Board’s Technical Advisory Subcommittee in developing the best available technology standards referenced in subdivision (b).(g)The state board and regional boards may consult with the Safer Fertilizer Task Force and Fertilizer Inspection Advisory Board’s Technical Advisory Subcommittee in implementing the update to the Irrigated Lands Regulatory Program pursuant to Section 16302.